Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Article 7. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 21-29-301.
Creditable service provided under certain circumstances for membership service interrupted by qualified military service.

Any member of the Municipal Retirement System whose membership service is interrupted as a result of qualified military service within the meaning of Section 414(u)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, and who has received the maximum service credit available under Article 1, 3 or 5 of this chapter, shall receive creditable service for the period of qualified military service that does not qualify as creditable service under Article 1, 3 or 5 of this chapter upon reentering membership service in an amount not to exceed five (5) years if:

The member pays the contributions he would have made to the retirement system if he had remained in membership service for the period of qualified military service based upon his salary at the time his membership service was interrupted;

The member returns to membership service within ninety (90) days of the end of his qualified military service; and

The employer at the time the member’s service was interrupted and to which employment the member returns pays the contribution it would have made into the retirement system for such period based on the member’s salary at the time the service was interrupted.

The payments required to be made in subsection (1)(a) of this section may be made over a period beginning with the date of return to membership service and not exceeding three (3) times the member’s qualified military service; however, in no event shall such period exceed five (5) years.

The member shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of trustees of certification of military service showing dates of entrance into qualified service and the date of discharge as well as proof that the member has returned to active employment within the time specified.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494.3; Laws, 1954, ch. 348; Laws, 2001, ch. 438, § 9; Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 21-29-305.
Employers to pick up member contributions to employees’ retirement and disability systems.

Each employer shall pick up the member contributions required by Sections 21-29-17, 21-29-117 and 21-29-219, Mississippi Code of 1972, for all compensation earned after January 1, 1989, and the contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions in determining tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code and the Mississippi Income Tax Code; however, each employer shall continue to withhold federal and state income taxes based upon such contributions until the Internal Revenue Service or the federal courts rule that, pursuant to Section 414(h) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, these contributions shall not be included as gross income of the member until such time as they are distributed or made available. The employer may pick up these contributions by a reduction in the cash salary of the member, or by an offset against a future salary increase, or by a combination of a reduction in salary and offset against a future salary increase. If member contributions are picked up they shall be treated for all purposes of the General Municipal Employees’ Retirement System and Firemen’s and Policemen’s Disability Relief Funds under Articles 1, 3 and 5 of this chapter in the same manner and to the same extent as member contributions made prior to the date picked up.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 503, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 438, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 21-29-307.
Benefits exempt from taxes, attachment or other process, and unassignable; deductions from retirement allowances of employer or system sponsored group life or health insurance.

The right of a person to an annuity, a retirement allowance, or benefit, or to the return of contributions, or to any optional benefit or any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of Articles 1, 3 or 5 of this chapter; the system; and the monies in the system created by such articles, are hereby exempt from any state, county or municipal ad valorem taxes, income taxes, premium taxes, privilege taxes, property taxes, sales and use taxes, or other taxes not so named, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, and exempt from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment or any other process whatsoever, and shall be unassignable except as specifically otherwise provided in Article 1, 3 or 5 of this chapter effective January 1, 1988, and except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section.

Any retired member or beneficiary receiving a retirement allowance or benefit under Article 1, 3 or 5 of this chapter may authorize the Public Employees’ Retirement System to make deductions from the retirement allowance or benefit for the payment of employer or system sponsored group life or health insurance. The deductions authorized under this subsection shall be subject to rules and regulations adopted by the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

HISTORY:
Laws of 1989, ch. 503, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 523, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 523, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 531, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 21-29-311.
Additional optional benefits available.

Any municipality providing benefits under Articles 1, 3 or 5 of this chapter may provide the following additional optional benefits:

Refunds of member contributions to the estate of the deceased at the time of death when the deceased does not have eligible beneficiaries.

Benefits to dependent children through the age of twenty-three (23) when the dependent child or children are full-time college students.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 503, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 21-29-313.
Schedule for computation of membership service or prior service.

Notwithstanding any other provision of Articles 1, 3 or 5, in the computation of membership service or prior service under the provisions of Articles 1, 3 and 5, the following schedule shall govern: ten (10) or more months of service during any fiscal year shall constitute a year of service; seven (7) months to nine (9) months, inclusive, three-quarters (3/4) of a year of service; four (4) months to six (6) months, inclusive, one-half (1/2) year of service; one (1) month to three (3) months, inclusive, one-quarter (1/4) of a year of service.

Benefits payable under the provisions of Articles 1, 3 and 5 that previously were made on the basis of full years of creditable service shall be computed on the basis of the fractional years of service as provided in this section beginning July 1, 1991.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 513, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 21-29-315.
Repayment of refund after reemployment following retirement for purpose of reestablishing contributing membership.

Any active member who previously received a refund under either Article 1, 3 or 5 and who was reemployed and again became a contributing member of the applicable retirement system may repay all amounts previously received as a refund, together with regular interest at the rate as determined by the board, covering the period from the date of refund to the date of repayment. Upon such repayment, the active member shall again receive credit for the entire period of creditable service that was forfeited upon the receipt of the refund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 513, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 21-29-316.
Rollover distribution of accumulated contributions to eligible retirement plan or individual retirement account.

Pursuant to the Unemployment Compensation Amendments of 1992 (Public Law 102-318 (UCA)), a member or the spouse of a member who is an eligible beneficiary entitled to a refund under Article 1, 3 or 5 of this chapter may elect on a form prescribed by the board under rules and regulations established by the board, to have an eligible rollover distribution of accumulated contributions payable under this section paid directly to an eligible retirement plan, as defined under applicable federal law, or an individual retirement account. If the member or the spouse of a member who is an eligible beneficiary makes that election and specifies the eligible retirement plan or individual retirement account to which the distribution is to be paid, the distribution will be made in the form of a direct trustee-to-trustee transfer to the specified eligible retirement plan. A non-spouse beneficiary may elect to have an eligible rollover distribution paid in the form of a direct trustee-to-trustee transfer to an individual retirement account established to receive the distribution on behalf of the non-spouse beneficiary. Flexible rollovers under this subsection shall not be considered assignments under Section 21-29-307.

From and after July 1, 2001, subject to the rules adopted by the board of trustees, any plan under this chapter shall accept an eligible rollover distribution or a direct transfer of funds from another eligible retirement plan or an individual retirement account in payment of all or a portion of the cost to repay a refund as permitted by the plan. The plans may only accept rollover payments in an amount equal to or less than the balance due for reinstatement of service credit. The rules adopted by the board of trustees shall condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another eligible retirement plan on the receipt of information necessary to enable the system to determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 438, § 11; Laws, 2002, ch. 313, § 7; Laws, 2008, ch. 359, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 21-29-317.
Maximum annual retirement allowance.

Notwithstanding any provisions of Articles 1, 3 and 5 of this chapter to the contrary, the maximum annual retirement allowance attributable to the employer contributions payable by the system to a member under Article 1, 3 or 5 of this chapter shall be subject to the limitations set forth in Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code and any regulations issued thereunder as applicable to governmental plans as the term is defined under Section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code.

The Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System is authorized to provide by rule or regulation for the payment of benefits as provided under Articles 1, 3 and 5 of this chapter to members or beneficiaries of a municipal employees retirement fund or disability and relief fund at a time and under circumstances not otherwise provided for in this chapter to the extent that the payment is required to maintain the municipal employees retirement fund or disability and relief fund as a qualified retirement plan for purposes of federal income tax laws.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this plan, all distributions from this plan shall conform to the regulations issued under Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, applicable to governmental plans, as defined in Section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, including the incidental death benefit provisions of Section 401(a)(9)(G) of the Internal Revenue Code. Further, such regulations shall override any plan provision that is inconsistent with Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code.

The actuarial assumptions used to convert a retirement allowance from the normal form of payment to an optional form of payment shall be an appendix to Article 7 of this chapter and subject to approval by the board of directors based upon certification by the actuary.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this plan, the maximum compensation that can be considered for all plan purposes shall not be greater than that allowed under Section 401(a)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code.

In the event of the termination of one or more of the retirement plans established pursuant to Article 1, 3 or 5 of this chapter, all members of the plan or system as of the date of termination of the system shall be deemed to have a vested right to benefits to the extent and in the same manner that rights would be vested under the laws existing as of the date of termination of the system; however, any member, who because of a termination of the system has not fulfilled the requirements for length of service, shall be entitled to compensation as of the date that such member would otherwise be eligible, with such compensation to be computed on the basis of time actually a member of the service and compensation actually earned during the time a member, in the manner now provided by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 576 § 10; Laws, 1995, ch. 624, § 11; Laws, 2001, ch. 438, § 12; Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 21; Laws, 2007, ch. 348, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 21-29-319.
Employment-related fringe benefits.

Deductions made prior to retirement by the employer for employment-related fringe benefits may continue to be paid after retirement in accordance with rules and regulations established by the board of trustees if the retirement allowance payable under Section 21-29-1 et seq., Section 21-29-101 et seq., and Section 21-29-201 et seq., is in an amount sufficient to cover the deductions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 472, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 5, 1996).

§ 21-29-321.
Determination of average monthly base salary and longevity pay.

For purposes of determining the “average monthly base salary and longevity pay” as provided in Sections 21-29-101 et seq., the wages to be considered shall be the average base salary and longevity pay which was received in consecutive pay periods immediately preceding retirement. This amount shall be the average of six (6) pay periods if the employee was paid monthly, or the equivalent if the pay periods are bi-weekly, semi-monthly or weekly. In addition, wages may include holiday pay and regularly scheduled overtime pay earned for services performed during the last six (6) months of employment, as certified by the employer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 472 § 9; eff from and after passage (approved April 5, 1996).

§ 21-29-323.
Determination of amount of death benefits to be paid to or for benefit of dependent children.

Monthly benefits payable to a spouse in the event of the death of a member before retirement or a retiree after retirement shall be divided and paid to or for the benefit of any dependent children of the deceased member or retiree in an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the annual benefit payable to one (1) dependent child, twenty percent (20%) for two (2) dependent children, and thirty percent (30%) to three (3) or more dependent children. If there are more than three (3) dependent children, upon a child ceasing to be a dependent, his annuity shall terminate and there shall be a redetermination of the amounts payable to any remaining dependent children. Such benefits shall be paid to a surviving parent or lawful custodian of such children for the use and benefit of the children without the necessity of appointment of guardian. The remaining amount shall be paid to the spouse as otherwise provided.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 544, § 14; Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 21-29-325.
Payment of retirement benefits by the most appropriate means as determined by the board.

The Public Employees’ Retirement System shall make payments of retirement benefits under this chapter to members and to the beneficiaries of those members, by whatever means the board prescribes by regulation to be the most appropriate for the proper and efficient payment of benefits, including, but not limited to, direct deposit to an account with a financial institution that is a participant of the Automated Clearing House designated by the member or beneficiary. The board may provide for alternative means of payment if the member or beneficiary can demonstrate that payment by the prescribed means will cause the member or beneficiary undue hardship.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 4; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 21-29-327.
Board of Trustees of Public Employees’ Retirement System authorized to assess interest and bring suit on delinquent payments from municipalities whose retirement funds it administers.

Any municipality that has established a retirement fund or disability and relief fund under Articles 1, 3 and 5 of this chapter shall be assessed interest on delinquent payments as determined by the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board of trustees. Any delinquent payments, assessed interest and any other amount certified by the board of trustees as owed by the municipality may be recovered by action in a court of competent jurisdiction against the municipality or may, upon due certification of delinquency and at the request of the board of trustees, be deducted from any other monies payable to the municipality by any department or agency of the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 14, 2004.).

§ 21-29-329.
Municipalities may adopt resolutions allowing spouses receiving retirement benefits to continue to receive spouse benefits for life, even after remarriage.

Any municipality that has established a retirement fund or disability and relief fund under the provisions of Article 1, 3 or 5 of this chapter, shall be authorized to adopt a resolution to allow those spouses who are receiving retirement benefits under the provisions of those articles, to continue to receive the spouse retirement benefits for life even if the spouse remarries. The resolution also may provide that surviving spouses of deceased members who received spouse retirement benefits that were terminated upon remarriage may again receive the spouse retirement benefits from and after making application with the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System to reinstate the benefits. Any reinstatement of spouse retirement benefits shall be prospective only from and after the first of the month following the date of application for reinstatement.

The continuation or reinstatement of spouse retirement benefits authorized under this section shall not be continued or reinstated unless all of the following requirements are met:

The municipal retirement fund or disability and relief fund is actuarially sound, as shown by the most recent actuarial study required by Section 21-29-27, 21-29-119 or 21-29-221;

The municipal retirement fund or disability and relief fund will remain actuarially sound if the spouse retirement benefits are continued or reinstated, as shown by a certified statement from the actuarial firm that prepared the most recent actuarial study;

The governing authorities of the municipality adopt a resolution requesting the continuation or reinstatement of the spouse retirement benefits as authorized in this section and transmit the resolution to the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System; and

If applicable, the surviving spouse makes an application to the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System to reinstate the spouse retirement benefits.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 21-29-331.
Persons to whom benefits payable in event of death or disqualification of designated beneficiary.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, where benefits are payable to a designated beneficiary or beneficiaries under Article 1, 3 or 5 of this chapter and the designated beneficiary or beneficiaries as provided by the member on the most recent form filed with the system is deceased or otherwise disqualified at the time such benefits become payable, the following persons, in descending order of precedence, shall be eligible to receive such benefits:

The surviving spouse of the member or retiree;

The children of the member or retiree or their descendants, per stirpes;

The brothers and sisters of the member or retiree or their descendants, per stirpes;

The parents of the member or retiree;

The executor or administrator on behalf of the member or retiree’s estate;

The persons entitled by law to distribution of the member or retiree’s estate.

Any monthly benefits payable to a beneficiary who dies prior to cashing his or her final check(s) and/or any additional benefits payable pursuant to a cost-of-living adjustment still payable at the death of a beneficiary receiving monthly benefits shall be paid as follows:

The surviving spouse of the beneficiary;

The children of the beneficiary or their descendants, per stirpes;

The brothers and sisters of the beneficiary or their descendants, per stirpes;

The parents of the beneficiary;

The executor or administrator on behalf of the beneficiary’s estate;

The persons entitled by law to distribution of the beneficiary’s estate.

In the event no claim is made by any individual listed in subsection (2) of this section, a distribution may be made pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

Payment under the provisions of this section shall bar recovery by any other person of the benefits distributed. Payment of benefits made to one or more members of a class of individuals are made on behalf of all members of the class. Any members of the class coming forward after payment is made must look to those who received the payment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 528, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 21-29-333.
Waiver of benefits from the general municipal retirement system or firemen’s and policemen’s disability and relief fund.

A retiree or beneficiary may, on a form prescribed by and filed with the Executive Director of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, irrevocably waive all or a portion of any benefits from the general municipal retirement system or a firemen’s and policemen’s disability and relief fund to which the retiree or beneficiary is entitled.The waiver shall be binding on the heirs and assigns of any retiree or beneficiary and the same must agree to forever hold harmless the fund and the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi from any claim to the waived retirement benefits.

Any waiver under this section shall apply only to the person executing the waiver. A beneficiary shall be entitled to benefits according to the option selected by the member at the time of retirement. However, a beneficiary may, at the option of the beneficiary, execute a waiver of benefits under this subsection.

The fund shall retain all amounts that are not used to pay benefits because of a waiver executed under this subsection.

The Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System may provide rules and regulations for the administration of waivers under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 528, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2010.